nb: Totemdesign: Dobbelsidet; Enkelsidet; Annet
ko: 토템 디자인: 양면; 단면; 기타
fi: Toteemin muotoilu: Kaksipuolinen; Yksipuolinen; Muu
ro-RO: Design totem: Cu două fețe; Cu o singură față; Altele
zh-CN: 图腾设计: 双面; 单面; 其他
es: Diseño de tótem: Doble cara; Una cara; Otros
bg-BG: Дизайн на тотем: Двустранен; Едностранен; Други
ja: 自立型広告の種類: 両面; 片面; その他
pl: Projekt totemu: Dwustronny; Jednostronny; Inne
sv: Totemdesign: Dubbelsidig; Enkelsidig; Övrigt
da: Totemdesign: Dobbeltsidet; Enkeltsidet; Andet
lt-LT: Totemo dizainas: Dvipusis; Vienpusis; Kita
pt-BR: Design de totem: Dupla face; Uma face; Outro
th: การออกแบบรูปสลักบนเสา: สองด้าน; ด้านเดียว; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Dizajn totemu: Obojstranný; Jednostranný; Iné
vi: Thiết kế vật tổ: Hai mặt; Một mặt; Khác
pt-PT: Design de totem: Dupla face; Uma face; Outro
fr: Conception de totems: Double face; Une seule face; Autre
it: Design della cassetta: Doppi lavandini; Lavandino singolo; Altro
zh-TW: 圖騰設計: 雙面; 單面; 其他
nl: Totem-ontwerp: Dubbelzijdig; Enkelzijdig; Andere
sl-SI: Oblika totema: Dvostranski; Enostranski; Drugo
de: Design des Totems: Doppelseitig; Einseitig; Sonstiges
el: Σχέδιο τοτέμ: Διπλής όψης; Μονόπλευρη; Άλλο
ru: Конструкция тотема: Двусторонний; Односторонний; Другой
cs: Design totemu: Oboustranný; Jednostranný; Jiné
tr: Totem tasarımı: Çift taraflı; Tek taraflı; Diğer
hr-HR: Dizajn totema: Dvostrani; Jednostrani; Ostalo
hu: Jelzőoszlop kialakítása: Kétoldalas; Egyoldalas; Egyéb
en: Totem design: Double-sided; Single-sided; Other